Hawaii statutes.
§147-77 Signs and labels on cartons,
crates, etc. The signs and labels required by section 147-75 shall
likewise be affixed to the cartons, crates, and cases containing eggs required
to be marked as in the section provided. [L 1953, c 90, §1; RL 1955, §22-75;
HRS §147-77]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next